Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 29

Telephone Cooperatives

65-29-101. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Telephone Cooperative Act.”

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-2901.

Cross-References. Limitation of and immunity from actions for breach of fiduciary duty, § 48-58-601.

65-29-102. Purpose of cooperatives — Nonprofit corporations.

Cooperative, nonprofit, membership corporations may be organized under this chapter for the purpose of furnishing telephone service in rural areas to the widest practical number of users of such service; provided, that there shall be no duplication of service where reasonably adequate telephone service is available. Corporations organized under this chapter and corporations which become subject to this chapter in the manner provided in this chapter are referred to in this chapter as “cooperatives,” and shall be deemed to be not-for-profit corporations.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-2902.

Attorney General Opinions. Merger of telephone cooperative and for-profit Tennessee corporation, OAG 99-070, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 70 (3/22/99).

After Public Chapter 490 becomes effective, the Comptroller of the Treasury will continue to be responsible for reappraising the properties of modern market telecommunications providers. The reappraisal schedule for the telecommunications providers’ properties will remain the same. Their localized and nonoperating real property will be updated in each county during that county’s reappraisal year. Their operating properties will be assessed and updated annually. AG LEXIS 34 (7/26/2017).

65-29-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“De novo” means anew, afresh and from the beginning;

“Member” means each incorporator of a cooperative and each person admitted to and retaining membership in the cooperative, and includes a husband and wife admitted to joint membership;

“Person” includes any natural person, firm, association, corporation, business trust, partnership, federal agency, state or political subdivision or agency thereof, or any body politic; and

“Telephone service” means any communication service whereby communication through the electric or electronic transmission of impulses by or through any media such as wireless technology, wires, cables, microwaves, radio waves, light waves or any combination of such media or any other future transmission technology which may become available to improve communication services, is the principal intended use thereof, and includes all telephone lines, facilities or systems used in the rendition of such service.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 3; T.C.A., § 65-2903; Acts 1999, ch. 307, § 1.

65-29-104. Powers.

A cooperative has the power to:

Sue and to be sued, in its corporate name;

Have perpetual existence;

Adopt a corporate seal and alter the same at pleasure;

Furnish, improve and extend telephone service, provide extended area service and telephone toll service to its members, to governmental agencies and political subdivisions, and to other persons not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the number of its members; provided, that without regard to the ten percent (10%) limitation, telephone service may be made available by a cooperative through interconnection of facilities to any number of subscribers of other telephone systems, and through pay stations to any number of users; and provided further, that a cooperative which, prior to its becoming subject to this chapter, has acquired all or part of a telephone system or systems may continue service to persons served from such systems or facilities without requiring such persons to become members, but only if the number of persons so served does not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total number of persons served by the cooperative and the twenty-five percent (25%) exception shall be reduced to ten percent (10%) within twelve (12) months from date of acquisition; and provided further, that such nonmembers shall have the right to become members upon such terms as may be prescribed in the bylaws;

Connect and interconnect its telephone lines, facilities or system with other telephone lines or systems, and make its facilities available to persons furnishing telephone service within or without this state;

Become a member in one (1) or more other cooperatives or corporations or own stock in one (1) or more other cooperatives or corporations;

Construct, maintain, operate, purchase, take, receive, lease as lessee or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, use, equip, maintain, and operate, and sell, assign, transfer, convey, exchange, lease as lessor, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or encumber, telephone communication lines or systems, lands, buildings, structures, exchanges, plants and equipment, and any and all kinds and classes of real or personal property whatsoever, which shall be deemed necessary, convenient, or appropriate to accomplish the purpose for which the cooperative is organized;

Purchase or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, use, and exercise and sell, assign, transfer, convey, mortgage, pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise dispose of or encumber, franchises, rights, privileges, licenses, rights-of-way, or easements;

Borrow money and otherwise contract indebtedness, and issue or guarantee notes, bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness therefor, and secure the payment thereof by mortgage, pledge, deed of trust, or any other encumbrance upon any or all of its then-owned or after-acquired real or personal property, assets, franchises, revenues or income;

Make any and all contracts necessary or convenient for the full exercise of the powers in this chapter granted, including, but not limited to, contracts with any person for the purchase or sale of telephone service and in connection with any such contract to stipulate and agree to such covenants, terms, and conditions as the board of directors may deem appropriate, including covenants, terms and conditions with respect to resale rates, financial and accounting methods, services, operation and maintenance practices, and, consistent with § 65-29-122, the manner of disposing of the revenues of the properties operated and maintained by the cooperative;

Construct, maintain, and operate telephone and communication lines, along, upon, under and across all public thoroughfares, including, without limitation, all roads, highways, streets, alleys, bridges, and causeways, and upon, under, and across all publicly owned lands; provided, that the respective authorities having jurisdiction thereof shall have the authority to designate or specify where poles shall be located;

Condemn, subject to § 65-29-125, either the fee or such right, title, interest, or easement in property as the board of directors may deem necessary for its corporate purpose, and such property or interest in such property may be so acquired whether or not the same is owned or held for public use by corporations, associations, or persons having the power of eminent domain, or otherwise held or used for public purposes, and such power of condemnation may be exercised in the mode of procedure prescribed by §§ 29-16-101 — 29-16-122, 29-16-202 and 29-16-203 or in the mode or method of procedure prescribed by any other applicable statutory provisions now in force or hereafter enacted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain;

Conduct its business and exercise any or all of its powers within or without this state;

Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws; and

Do and perform any and all other acts and things and have and exercise any and all other powers which may be necessary, convenient, or appropriate to accomplish the purpose for which the cooperative is organized.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 4; T.C.A., § 65-2904; Acts 2014, ch. 927, § 13.

65-29-105. Name — Conversion of existing corporations.

The name of each cooperative shall include the words “telephone” and “cooperative,” and the abbreviation “Inc.”; provided, that such limitation shall not apply if, in an affidavit made by the president or vice president of a cooperative and filed with the secretary of state, or in an affidavit made by a person signing articles of incorporation, consolidation, merger or conversion and filed, together with such articles, with the secretary of state, it shall appear that the cooperative desires to transact business in another state and is precluded therefrom by reason of its name; and provided further, that any corporation heretofore organized under § 4146 et seq. of the 1932 Tennessee Code, or such sections as from time to time amended, or § 48-1101, et seq., or amendments thereto, as such provisions existed prior to July 1, 1969, which may be converted into a cooperative and become subject to this chapter, as provided in § 65-29-117, or any foreign corporation transacting business in this state pursuant to § 65-29-128, may at its election retain the same corporate name which it has prior to such conversion or transaction of business.

The name of a cooperative shall distinguish it from the name of any other corporation organized under the laws of, or authorized to transact business in, this state. The words “telephone” and “cooperative” shall not both be used in the name of any corporation organized under the laws of, or authorized to transact business in, this state, except a cooperative or corporation transacting business in this state pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 5; T.C.A., § 65-2905.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 4146 et seq., referred to in this section, were renumbered §§ 48-1101 et seq. in the 1955 Code. Code 1955, §§ 48-1101 et seq., also referred to in this section, were subsequently repealed by Acts 1968, ch. 523, § 1, effective July 1, 1969.

65-29-106. Incorporators.

Five (5) or more natural persons, or two (2) or more cooperatives, may organize a cooperative in the manner provided for in this chapter.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 6; T.C.A., § 65-2906.

65-29-107. Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation of a cooperative shall recite in the caption that they are executed pursuant to this chapter, shall be signed and acknowledged by each of the incorporators, and shall state:

The name of the cooperative;

The address of its principal office;

The names and addresses of the incorporators;

The names and addresses of the persons who shall constitute its first board of directors; and

Any provisions not inconsistent with this chapter deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of its business and affairs.

Such articles of incorporation shall be submitted to the secretary of state for filing as provided in this chapter.

It shall not be necessary to set forth in the articles of incorporation of a cooperative the purpose for which it is organized or any of the corporate powers vested in a cooperative under this chapter.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 7; T.C.A., § 65-2907.

Cross-References. Fee for filing articles, § 65-29-120.

Filing articles of incorporation, § 65-29-119.

65-29-108. Bylaws.

The board of directors shall adopt the first bylaws to be adopted following an incorporation, conversion, merger or consolidation. Thereafter, bylaws shall be adopted, amended, or repealed by its members, by the affirmative vote of a majority of those members voting thereon at a meeting of the members. The bylaws shall set forth the rights and duties of members and directors and may contain other provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of the cooperative not inconsistent with this chapter or with its articles of incorporation.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 8; T.C.A., § 65-2908.

65-29-109. Members of cooperative — Meetings — Notice — Quorum — Votes.

No person who is not an incorporator shall become a member of a cooperative unless such person shall agree to use telephone service furnished by the cooperative when such telephone service shall be available through its facilities. The bylaws of a cooperative may provide that any person, including an incorporator, shall cease to be a member thereof if such person shall fail or refuse to use telephone service made available by the cooperative within a specified time after having become a member. Membership in the cooperative shall not be transferable, except as may be provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may prescribe additional qualifications and limitations in respect of membership.

An annual meeting of the members shall be held at such time as shall be provided in the bylaws.

Special meetings of the members may be called by the board of directors, by any three (3) directors, by not less than ten percent (10%) of all the members, or by the president.

Meetings of members shall be held at such place as may be provided in the bylaws. In the absence of any such provision, all meetings shall be held in the city or town in which the principal office of the cooperative is located.

Except as hereinafter otherwise provided, written or printed notice stating the time and place of each meeting of members, and in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given to each member, either personally or by mail, not less than five (5) nor more than twenty-five (25) days before the date of the meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the United States mail with postage prepaid to the member at such member's address as it appears on the records of the cooperative.

A quorum shall consist of the presence in person of two percent (2%) of all members of the cooperative or fifty (50) members, whichever is the lesser, for the transaction of business at all meetings of the members, unless the bylaws prescribe the presence of a greater percentage or number of the members for a quorum, or unless the business to be transacted requires by this chapter a larger percentage to transact the particular business before the meeting. If less than a quorum is present at any meeting, a majority of those present in person may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice. The directors are authorized to amend the bylaws of the cooperative to conform with the minimum requirements for a quorum set forth in this subsection (f).

Each member shall be entitled to one (1) vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting. Voting shall be in person, but, if the bylaws so provide, may also be by proxy or by mail, or both. If the bylaws provide for voting by proxy or by mail, they shall also prescribe the conditions under which proxy or mail voting shall be exercised. No person shall vote as proxy for more than one (1) member at any meeting of the members, and/or election.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 9; T.C.A., § 65-2909.

Cross-References. Election challenges brought in criminal court, § 65-29-133.

65-29-110. Initiative by members.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any proposition embodied in a petition signed by not less than ten percent (10%) of all members of the cooperative, together with any document submitted with such petition to give effect to the proposition, shall be submitted to the members of a cooperative either at a special meeting of the members held within forty-five (45) days after the presentation of such petition to the board of directors, or, if the date of the next annual meeting of members falls within ninety (90) days after such presentation or if the petition so requests, at such annual meeting.

The approval of the board of directors shall not be required in respect of any proposition or document submitted to the members pursuant to this section and approved by them, but such proposition or document shall be subject to all other applicable provisions of this chapter.

Any affidavit or affidavits required to be filed with any such document pursuant to applicable provisions of this chapter shall, in such case, be modified to show compliance with this section.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 17; T.C.A., § 65-2910.

65-29-111. Board of directors.

The business and affairs of a cooperative shall be managed by a board of not less than five (5) directors, each of whom shall be a member of the cooperative or of another cooperative which is a member. The bylaws shall prescribe the number of directors, their qualifications and area of representation, other than those provided for in this chapter, the manner of holding meetings of the board of directors, and of the election of successors to directors who shall resign, die or otherwise be incapable of acting. The bylaws may also provide for the removal of directors from office and for the election of their successors. Without approval of the members, directors shall not receive any salaries for their services as directors and, except in emergencies, shall not be employed by the cooperative in any capacity involving compensation, without approval of the members. The bylaws may, however, provide that a fixed fee and expenses of attendance, if any, be allowed to each director for attendance at each meeting of the board of directors.

The directors of a cooperative named in any articles of incorporation, consolidation, merger, or conversion, as the case may be, shall hold office until the next following annual meeting of the members or until their successors shall have been elected and qualified; provided, that in the case of a corporation being converted under § 65-29-117, the directors can be named in the articles of conversion for staggered terms of from one (1) to three (3) years if same is allowed by the converting corporation's current bylaws. At each annual meeting or special meeting, or annual election if so provided by the bylaws, called for the election of directors, or, in case of failure to hold the annual meeting, or annual election, as specified in the bylaws, at a special meeting called for that purpose, the members shall elect directors to hold office until the next following annual meeting of the members, except as hereinafter otherwise provided. Each director shall hold office for the term for which such director is elected or until a successor shall have been elected and qualified.

The bylaws may provide that, in lieu of electing the whole number of directors annually, the directors shall be divided into two (2) classes at the first or any subsequent annual meeting, each class to be as nearly equal in number as possible, with the term of office of the directors of the first class to expire at the next succeeding annual meeting and the term of the second class to expire at the second succeeding annual meeting. At each annual meeting, or annual election if so provided by the bylaws, after such classification a number of directors equal to the number of the class whose term expires at the time of such meeting shall be elected to hold office until the second succeeding annual meeting. Or the bylaws may provide that in lieu of electing the whole number of directors annually, the directors shall be divided into three (3) classes at the first or any subsequent annual meeting, each class to be as nearly equal in number as possible, with the term of office of the directors of the first class to expire at the next succeeding annual meeting, the term of the second class to expire at the second succeeding annual meeting, and the term of the third class to expire at the third succeeding annual meeting. At each annual meeting, or annual election if so provided by the bylaws, after such classification a number of directors equal to the number of the class whose term expires at the time of such meeting shall be elected to hold office for three (3) years or until the third succeeding annual meeting.

A majority of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum.

If a husband and wife hold joint membership in a cooperative, pursuant to appropriate bylaws provision, either one, but not both, may be elected as director.

The board of directors may exercise all of the powers of a cooperative except such as are conferred upon the members by this chapter, or its articles of incorporation or bylaws.

In any cooperative organized under this section for such election to be held, which provides service in five (5) or more counties, including a county containing and physically divided by a United States government corps of engineers dam and reservoir project of thirty-four thousand (34,000) acres or more, and which serves less than twenty thousand (20,000) subscribers as of April 15, 1986, all contested elections for members of the board of directors shall be held on voting machines and under the supervision of the election commission. Any election contest pursuant to this subsection (g) shall be filed and tried by the criminal court of the county where the election occurs. The board of directors is hereby authorized to contract with any county election commission, or the employees thereof, affected by the terms of this subsection (g) for the purpose of holding an election pursuant to this subsection (g).

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 10; 1973, ch. 157, § 4; T.C.A., § 65-2911; Acts 1986, ch. 800, § 1.

Cross-References. Election challenges brought in criminal courts, § 65-29-133.

65-29-112. Officers.

The officers of a cooperative shall consist of a president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer, who shall be elected annually by and from the board of directors. No person shall continue to hold any of the above offices after having ceased to be a director. The offices of secretary and of treasurer may be held by the same person. The board of directors may also elect or appoint such other officers, agents, or employees as it shall deem necessary or advisable and shall prescribe the powers and duties of such officers, agents, or employees. Any officer may be removed from office and a successor elected in the manner prescribed in the bylaws.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 11; T.C.A., § 65-2912.

65-29-113. Amendment of articles of incorporation — Certificate of change of principal office.

A cooperative may amend its articles of incorporation by complying with the following requirements:

The proposed amendment shall be first approved by the board of directors and shall then be submitted to a vote of the members at any annual or special meeting thereof, the notice of which shall set forth the proposed amendment. The proposed amendment, with such changes as the members shall choose to make therein, shall be deemed to be approved on the affirmative vote of not less than two thirds (2/3) of those members voting thereon at such meeting; and

Upon such approval by the members, articles of amendment shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by its president or vice president, and its corporate seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The articles of amendment shall recite in the caption that they are executed pursuant to this chapter and shall state:

The name of the cooperative;

The address of its principal office;

The date of the filing of its articles of incorporation in the office of the secretary of state; and

The amendment to its articles of incorporation;

The president or vice president executing such articles of amendment shall also make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that there was compliance with this section.

A cooperative may, without amending its articles of incorporation, upon authorization of its board of directors, change the location of its principal office by filing a certificate of change of principal office executed and acknowledged by its president or vice president under its seal attested by its secretary, in the office of the secretary of state and also in each county office in which its articles of incorporation or any prior certificate of change of principal office of such cooperative has been filed. Such cooperative shall also, within thirty (30) days after the filing of such certificate of change of principal office in any county office, file therein certified copies of its articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, if the same are not already on file in the county office.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 12; T.C.A., § 65-2913.

65-29-114. Consolidation.

Any two (2) or more cooperatives, each of which is hereinafter designated a “consolidating cooperative,” may consolidate into a new cooperative, hereinafter designated the “new cooperative,” by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for the consolidation of the consolidating cooperatives into the new cooperative and proposed articles of consolidation to give effect thereto shall be first approved by the board of directors of each consolidating cooperative. The proposed articles of consolidation shall recite in the caption that they are executed pursuant to this chapter, and shall state:

The name of each consolidating cooperative, the address of its principal office, and the date of the filing of its articles of incorporation in the office of the secretary of state;

The name of the new cooperative and the address of its principal office;

The names and addresses of the persons who shall constitute the first board of directors of the new cooperative;

The terms and conditions of the consolidation and the mode of carrying the same into effect, including the manner and basis of converting memberships in each consolidating cooperative into memberships in the new cooperative and the issuance of certificates of membership in respect of such converted memberships; and

Any provisions not inconsistent with this chapter deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business and affairs of the new cooperative.

The proposition for the consolidation of the consolidating cooperatives into the new cooperative and the proposed articles of consolidation approved by the board of directors of each consolidating cooperative shall then be submitted to a vote of the members thereof at any annual or special meeting thereof, the notice of which shall set forth full particulars concerning the proposed consolidation. The proposed consolidation and the proposed articles of consolidation shall be deemed to be approved upon the affirmative vote of not less than two thirds (2/3) of those members of each consolidating cooperative voting thereon at such meeting.

Upon such approval by the members of the respective consolidating cooperatives, articles of consolidation in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of each consolidating cooperative by its president or vice president and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The president or vice president of each consolidating cooperative executing such articles of consolidation shall also make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that this section was duly complied with by such cooperative.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 13; T.C.A., §§ 65-2914.

65-29-115. Merger.

Any one (1) or more cooperatives, each of which is hereinafter designated a “merging cooperative,” may merge into another cooperative, hereinafter designated the “surviving cooperative,” by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for the merger of the merging cooperatives into the surviving cooperative and proposed articles of merger to give effect thereto shall be first approved by the board of directors of each merging cooperative and the board of directors of the surviving cooperative. The proposed articles of merger shall recite in the caption that they are executed pursuant to this chapter and shall state:

The name of each merging cooperative, the address of its principal office, and the date of the filing of its articles of incorporation in the office of the secretary of state;

The name of the surviving cooperative and the address of its principal office;

A statement that the merging cooperatives elect to be merged into the surviving cooperative;

The terms and conditions of the merger and the mode of carrying the same into effect, including the manner and basis of converting the memberships in the merging cooperative or cooperatives into memberships in the surviving cooperative and the issuance of certificates of membership in respect of such converted memberships; and

Any provisions not inconsistent with this chapter deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business and affairs of the surviving cooperative.

The proposition for the merger of the merging cooperatives into the surviving cooperative and the proposed articles of merger approved by the board of directors of the respective cooperatives, parties to the proposed merger, shall then be submitted to a vote of the members of each such cooperative at any annual or special meeting thereof, the notice of which shall set forth full particulars concerning the proposed merger. The proposed merger and the proposed articles of merger shall be deemed to be approved upon the affirmative vote of not less than two thirds (2/3) of those members of each cooperative voting thereon at such meeting.

Upon such approval by the members of the respective cooperatives, parties to the proposed merger, articles of merger in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of each such cooperative by its president or vice president and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The president or vice president of each cooperative executing such articles of merger shall also make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that this section was duly complied with by such cooperative. Such articles of merger and affidavits shall be submitted to the secretary of state for filing as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 14; T.C.A., § 65-2915.

Attorney General Opinions. Merger of telephone cooperative and for-profit Tennessee corporation, OAG 99-070, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 70 (3/22/99).

65-29-116. Effect of consolidation or merger.

The effect of consolidation or merger shall be as follows:

The several cooperatives, parties to the consolidation or merger, shall be a single cooperative, which, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new cooperative provided for in the articles of consolidation, and, in the case of a merger, shall be that cooperative designated in the articles of merger as the surviving cooperative, and the separate existence of all cooperatives, parties to the consolidation or merger, except the new or surviving cooperative, shall cease;

Such new or surviving cooperative shall have all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of a cooperative organized under this chapter, and shall possess all the rights, privileges, immunities and franchises as well of a public as of a private nature, and all property, real and personal, applications for membership, all debts due on whatever account, and all other choses in action, of each of the consolidating or merging cooperatives, and furthermore all and every interest of, or belonging or due to, each of the cooperatives so consolidated or merged, shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested in such new or surviving cooperative without further act or deed; and the title to any real estate, or any interest therein, under the laws of this state vested in any such cooperatives shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of such consolidation or merger;

Such new or surviving cooperative shall thenceforth be responsible and liable for all of the liabilities and obligations of each of the cooperatives so consolidated or merged, and any claim existing, or action or proceeding pending, by or against any of such cooperatives may be prosecuted as if such consolidation or merger had not taken place, but such new or surviving cooperatives may be substituted in its place;

Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any such cooperatives shall be impaired by such consolidation or merger; and

In the case of a consolidation, the articles of consolidation shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the new cooperative; and in the case of a merger, the articles of incorporation of the surviving cooperative shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving cooperative are provided for in the articles of merger.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 15; T.C.A, § 65-2916.

65-29-117. Conversion of existing corporations.

Any corporation, private or not-for-profit organized under the laws of this state for the purpose, among others, of supplying telephone service to its subscribers may be converted into a cooperative and become subject to this chapter with the same effect as if originally organized under this chapter by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for the conversion of such corporation into a cooperative and proposed articles of conversion to give effect thereto shall be first approved by the board of trustees or the board of directors, as the case may be, of such corporation. The proposed articles of conversion shall recite in the caption that they are executed pursuant to this chapter and shall state:

The name of the corporation prior to its conversion into a cooperative;

The address of the principal office of such corporation;

The date of the filing of articles of incorporation of such corporation in the office of the secretary of state;

The statute or statutes under which such corporation was organized;

The name assumed by such corporation;

A statement that such corporation elects to become a cooperative, nonprofit, membership corporation subject to this chapter;

The manner and basis of converting either memberships in or shares of stock of such corporation into membership in the converted corporation; and

Any provisions not inconsistent with this chapter deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business and affairs;

The proposition for the conversion of such corporation into a cooperative and the proposed articles of conversion approved by the board of trustees or board of directors, as the case may be, of such corporation shall then be submitted to a vote of the members or stockholders, as the case may be, of such corporation at any duly held annual or special meeting thereof, the notice of which shall set forth full particulars concerning the proposed conversion. The proposition for the conversion of such corporation into a cooperative and the proposed articles of conversion, with such amendments thereto as the members or stockholders of such corporation shall choose to make, shall be deemed to be approved upon the affirmative vote of not less than two thirds (2/3) of those members of such corporation voting thereon at such meeting, or if such corporation is a stock corporation, upon the affirmative vote of the holders of not less than two thirds (2/3) of the capital stock of such corporation represented at such meeting; provided, that for the purposes of this section, a quorum under the provisions contained in § 65-29-109(f), shall constitute a quorum of any converting general welfare corporation or corporation not-for-profit whether or not such would be the quorum under any other existing law; and

Upon such approval by the members or stockholders of such corporation, articles of conversion in the form approved by such members or stockholders shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of such corporation by its president or vice president, and its corporate seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The president or vice president executing such articles of conversion on behalf of such corporation shall also make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that there has been compliance with the provisions of this section with respect to the approval of its trustees or directors and its members or stockholders, of the proposition for the conversion of such corporation into a cooperative and such articles of conversion. Such articles of conversion and affidavit shall be submitted to the secretary of state for filing as provided in this chapter.

“Articles of incorporation,” as used in this chapter, includes the articles of conversion of a converted corporation.

Acts 1961, ch. 330, § 16; 1973, ch. 157, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-2917.